Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 4 Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System
24-4-206. Funding — Additional liabilities — Local Government Division.

Whenever the General Assembly shall enact any laws which create additional eligibility or liabilities for county constitutional officers or for county employees or municipal employees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall determine, based upon actuarial valuation, that the method of funding the additional liabilities is not sufficient to meet the unfunded obligations created by the additional benefit or eligibility provision, then the procedures established in this section shall be followed in providing the necessary moneys to actuarially fund the additional liabilities.

The Executive Director of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall cause an actuarial valuation to be made of the additional liabilities created by the laws.

In the event the actuary determines that the employee and employer contributions are actuarially insufficient to pay the benefits of the elected county constitutional officer members or county or municipal employee members of the Local Government Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, the director shall establish accounts and records to identify the estimated contributions and other income available to actuarially fund the members' benefits when they mature, as well as the extent that each county's member liabilities will exceed the amount of employee and employer contributions and interest thereon.

The director shall then calculate, with the assistance of the actuary, the amount of funds required annually or on a lump-sum basis to actuarially fund the additional unfunded liabilities created by the laws with respect to members from each county or municipality. He or she shall annually or on a lump-sum basis certify to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State the amount required for the year or on a lump-sum basis to establish sufficient funds and reserves to meet the actuarial requirements of the additional benefits.

The certificate of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall reflect the amount of the annual extra payment to be charged against each of the several counties and municipalities, based on the unfunded liabilities with respect to their officials and employee members of the Local Government Division.

The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall cause the amount so certified to be transferred from the County Aid Fund or from the Municipal Aid Fund, as the case may be, from general revenues allocated thereto for turnback to counties or municipalities to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund for credit to the Local Government Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

From the general revenues allocated thereto for turnback to counties or municipalities, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall deduct from the County Aid Fund turnback to be received by each county an amount as computed pursuant to this section required to pay retirement benefits for its elected county constitutional officer members, and for its county employee members of the Local Government Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

From general revenues allocated thereto for turnback to municipalities, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall deduct from the Municipal Aid Fund turnback to be received by each municipality an amount, payable upon actuarial determination, required to pay retirement benefits for their municipal employee members from each of the respective municipalities.

The moneys to be transferred from the County Aid Fund and the Municipal Aid Fund shall not be charged against the total of the county aid or municipal aid funds available for distribution to counties or municipalities.

It is the intent of this section that each county pay annually from its County Aid Fund general revenues turnback, and that each municipality pay annually from its Municipal Aid Fund general revenues turnback, the amount of money required to meet the unfunded liability deficit in behalf of its respective county and municipal employee members of the system resulting from the enactment of the laws.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 373, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2504.1; Acts 1999, No. 308, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The Local Government Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, referred to in this section, may no longer exist as a separate division of the system. For present organizational structure of the system, see § 24-4-201.

24-4-207. Bonds — Payments on vouchers and warrants — Adjustment of erroneous payments.

The Executive Director of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and other employees shall make bonds to cover their liability for the faithful performance of their duties, from time to time as provided for by law.

The cost of the bonds shall be paid from moneys provided for the administrative expenses of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized and directed to designate such additional personnel within his or her office and to provide for such services as are necessary for the proper operation of the system.

The Treasurer of State shall pay annuities and make other disbursements authorized by this act only on vouchers signed by the Executive Director of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and on warrants issued thereon by the Auditor of State.

No voucher or warrant shall be drawn on funds of the system unless it has been previously authorized by a specific or general resolution adopted by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

Should any change or error in the records of the system or any audit of a member's annuity calculations result in any person's receiving more or less than the person would have been entitled to receive had the records or the calculations been correct, the board shall correct the error and, as far as is equitable and practicable, shall adjust the payment in accordance with the provisions of this subsection and in such a manner that the actuarial equivalent of the benefit to which the person was correctly entitled shall be paid.

However, no monthly adjustment of less than one dollar ($1.00) shall be made.

The board shall have the right to recover any overpayment that any person may have received from funds of the system, provided the overpayment is determined and the person is so notified within one (1) year of the date of the last overpayment.

If the overpayment is determined at a date later than one (1) year after the date of the last overpayment, the overpayment shall not be recouped by the board unless the overpayment is a result of an error on the part of a member, retirant, or beneficiary.

In all instances where an overpayment is determined, any subsequent payments shall be adjusted to the correct amount.

If it is determined that any person has received an underpayment from the funds of the system, regardless of the date of the determination, the system shall pay in a lump sum to the person the total of any underpayments made prior to the date of determination, and any subsequent payments shall be adjusted to the correct amount.

If the annuity amount is decreased upon the reconsideration, the matters involved in the decrease shall be set forth in writing and shall be subject to review upon the filing of an appeal thereof by the member or annuity recipient.

The redetermination shall be deemed to be final and binding on all parties unless, within twenty (20) days after the mailing of notice of the redetermination to the member's last known address, or twenty (20) days after personal delivery of the notice to the member, an appeal thereof is filed with the Executive Director of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall promptly hear all appeals of annuity determinations or redeterminations and shall conduct such hearings in accordance with procedures set forth by the board.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 5; 1959, No. 42, § 5; 1965, No. 153, § 5; 1981, No. 859, § 5; 1983, No. 677, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2505; Acts 1993, No. 1093, § 1; 2001, No. 151, § 14; 2011, No. 38, § 3; 2019, No. 448, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 3552, 3553.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The operation of subdivisions (a)(1) and (a)(2) was suspended by adoption of a self-insured fidelity bond program for public officers, officials and employees, effective July 20, 1987, pursuant to § 21-2-701 et seq. The subdivisions may again become effective upon cessation of coverage under that program. See § 21-2-703.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment by No. 38 substituted “last” for “first” in (c)(2)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 448 substituted “last” for “first” in (c)(2)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a)(3) and (c)(4)(C).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-4-202.

24-4-208. Reduction of annuities when funds inadequate.

If, at the end of any fiscal year, the total of the annuities paid during the fiscal year from the State Division of the retirement reserve account is more than twelve percent (12%) of the sum of the balances in the State Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System of the employers' accumulation account and the retirement reserve account at the end of the fiscal year, the annuities payable to state retirants and beneficiaries in the ensuing fiscal year shall be reduced pro rata.

This reduction shall be made in such a manner that the total of the annuities so reduced shall not exceed twelve percent (12%) of the sum of the balances in the State Division of the employers' accumulation account and the retirement reserve account.

The pro rata reduction shall be applied to all annuities payable to state retirants and beneficiaries during the ensuing fiscal year.

If, at the end of any fiscal year, the total of the annuities paid during the fiscal year from the Local Government Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System of the retirement reserve account is more than twelve percent (12%) of the sum of the balances in the Local Government Division of the employers' accumulation account and the retirement reserve account at the end of the fiscal year, then the annuities payable to county retirants and beneficiaries in the ensuing fiscal year shall be reduced pro rata.

This reduction shall be made in such a manner that the total of the annuities so reduced shall not exceed twelve percent (12%) of the sum of the balances in the Local Government Division of the employers' accumulation account and the retirement reserve account.

The pro rata reduction shall be applied to all annuities payable to local government retirants and beneficiaries during the ensuing fiscal year.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 12; 1959, No. 42, § 12; 1961, No. 64, § 6; 1965, No. 153, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2512; Acts 2001, No. 151, § 15.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The State Division and Local Government Divisions of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, referred to in this section, may no longer exist as a separate division of the system. For present organizational structure of the system, see § 24-4-201.

24-4-209. Interest.

At the end of each fiscal year, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System may allow the crediting of interest at an amount to be determined on the balance at the beginning of the fiscal year in the members' deposit account and the employers' accumulation account.

The board shall be required to allow regular interest at the end of each fiscal year on the year's mean balance in the retirement reserve account.

The interest allowed under subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall be credited annually by the board to the accounts and shall be paid from the income account.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 13; 1959, No. 42, § 13; 1977, No. 793, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2513; Acts 1997, No. 299, § 10.

24-4-210. Transfer of funds to cover retired county constitutional officers.

On July 1, 1979, the actuary for the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall make a determination of the amount necessary to be collected on a monthly basis during the ensuing one hundred twenty (120) months to set up the Retirement Reserve Fund for all persons retired as elected county constitutional officers on July 1, 1978.

The amount, as determined by the actuary, shall be certified by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State. He or she shall in turn cause the amount so certified to be transferred in equal monthly installments from the County Aid Fund or from any other general revenue fund authorized by law for the purpose, from general revenues allocated thereto to counties, to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund for credit to the County Constitutional Officers' Subdivision.

The amounts so certified shall also include regular interest which would have been collected by the system.

As additional persons are retired under the provisions of the County Constitutional Officers' Subdivision after July 1, 1978, the retirement reserve amount as determined by the system's actuary shall be certified to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State by the board.

The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall then cause the amount so certified to be transferred in one (1) lump sum from the County Aid Fund or from any other general revenue fund authorized by law for the purpose, from general revenues allocated thereto to counties, to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund for credit to the County Constitutional Officers' Subdivision.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 754, § 1; 1977 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 14, § 1; 1979, No. 653, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2577.1; Acts 1997, No. 299, § 11.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The County Constitutional Officers' Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, referred to in this section, may no longer exist as a separate division of the system. For present organizational structure of the system, see § 24-4-201.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1977 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 14, § 2, provided that: “The purpose and intent of Acts 1977, No. 754 was to provide an appropriate method of funding the current liabilities of the County Elected Constitutional Officer Division (now Subdivision) of the Public Employees' Retirement System and of funding future liabilities of that division (now subdivision) which might accrue as a result of the retirement after June 30, 1977 of persons who had credited county elected constitutional officer service in the system on June 30, 1977. The section provided further that the repeal of the acts specifically referred to in Acts 1977, No. 754, § 2 would preclude persons who first served in a county elected constitutional office after July 1, 1977 from participating in or becoming eligible for the special county elected constitutional officer benefits prescribed in those acts and that it was not the intention of the General Assembly in repealing those acts to affect the rights of any person to retire and receive benefits thereunder if the person had retired and was receiving benefits thereunder on June 30, 1977, or had met the service requirements for retirement thereunder on June 30, 1977, or had any county elected constitutional officer credited service in the system on June 30, 1977, and if the person thereafter met the minimum service requirements for retiring and receiving benefits under the County Elected Constitutional Officer Division (now Subdivision). Rather, those persons were to continue to have the right to accumulate credited service and to receive benefits under those acts and the survivors of those persons had the right to receive benefits thereunder the same as if those acts had not been repealed.”

24-4-211. Disposition of funds returned to hospitals withdrawing from system.

Any hospital excluding its employees from the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and receiving a return of any funds as provided in § 24-4-302(3) shall immediately invest the funds in a retirement system or plan for the employees of the hospital.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 303, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2506.1.

24-4-212. No waiver of sovereign immunity.

Nothing in this chapter shall be taken or interpreted as a waiver of the state's sovereign immunity.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 38, § 4.

24-4-213. Socially responsible investments.

A decision on whether to invest, not invest, or withdraw from investment the funds of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall not be based on a consideration that the location of the investment, fund, company, or any other type of investment vehicle is in the State of Israel.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 770, § 1.

Subchapter 3
— Membership

Cross References.

Employees of state colleges included in membership, § 24-7-1001.

Preambles.

Acts 1959, No. 264 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, under the provisions of Act 177, approved March 7, 1957, a ‘member’ of the Arkansas State Employees Retirement System is defined as a person who has, by due process, had issued to him a certificate of membership in said System; and

“Whereas, said Act does not cover certain agencies of this State operating out of cash funds; and

“Whereas, under said Act, membership in the System may be terminated only by retirement, by permanent and total disability, by superannuation, by death, or by withdrawal, either voluntary or involuntary, from active service in the State of Arkansas; and

“Whereas, such Act is silent as to those persons who, on the effective date of said Act 177, became members of the System and who later transferred their employment from an agency of State covered by said System to another agency of State not so covered, which said latter agency is not covered by any retirement system or plan other than Social Security; and

“Whereas, the apparent oversight in the aforementioned respect in the drafting of said Act 177 has had the unintended effect of denying certain prospective benefits to members of the System who have not withdrawn their contributions in the System but who, nevertheless, have been continuously employed by an agency of this State whose employees are not otherwise covered by a retirement system or plan authorized by the laws of this State other than Social Security;

“Now, therefore….”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 17: Mar. 7, 1957. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined by the General Assembly that the establishment of a State Employees Retirement System is necessary in order to retain and recruit efficient and skilled state employees and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary in order that the Board of Trustees herein created be appointed, organize and establish the necessary rules and forms to be followed upon the establishment of the retirement system herein created on July 1, 1957. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1959, No. 42, § 16: Feb. 13, 1959. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined by the General Assembly that the coverage of county employees in a retirement system is necessary in order to retain and recruit efficient and skilled county employees; that the coverage is best obtained by including the county employees in the membership of the Arkansas State Employees Retirement System, established by Act 177 of 1957, as amended; that it is necessary for the Board of Trustees of said Arkansas State Employees Retirement System to organize and establish necessary rules, regulations and forms to effectuate said coverage of county employees. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1959, No. 264, § 4: July 1, 1959.

Acts 1961, No. 64, § 9: Feb. 9, 1961. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined by the General Assembly that the coverage of municipal employees in a retirement system is necessary in order to retain and recruit efficient and skilled municipal employees; that the coverage is best obtained by permitting the inclusion of municipal employees in the membership of the Arkansas State Employees Retirement System, established by Act 177 of 1957, as amended; that the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Employees Retirement System shall establish necessary rules, regulations and forms to effectuate said coverage of municipal employees. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1971, No. 228, § 3: Mar. 5, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the providing of reasonable and adequate retirement benefits is necessary for municipalities to attract qualified personnel as employees; that programs or plans for such retirement benefits may be available by which certain municipalities may enhance their prospects of attracting and retaining such personnel; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to provide such municipalities with more flexibility in adopting any such available program at the discretion of such municipalities. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 586, § 11: Became law without the Governor's signature, Apr. 3, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that provisions of this act clarify coverage, service, credits, and eligibility for benefits under the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System; and, in order to enable those persons who are eligible for such coverage, service credits, or benefits thereunder to obtain such without undue delay, the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of this Act is essential. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1187, § 3: Feb. 11, 1976. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined by the General Assembly that existing law relating to membership in the Public Employees Retirement System of employees of a county owned and operated hospital places a serious financial burden on certain hospitals owned and operated by counties within this State; that this Act is designed to permit the governing bodies of such hospitals to elect to exclude their employees from such membership and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 882, § 5: Mar. 28, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that municipalities of this State are allowed to enter and withdraw at will from the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System and this is deemed to be contrary to good public policy. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 57, § 4: Feb. 18, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the democratic process is being unnecessarily burdened by Act 470 of 1977; that the repeal of that Act is immediately necessary; that an undue hardship will result to the detriment of the public health, welfare and safety if this Act does not become effective immediately upon passage thereof. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 376, § 3: Mar. 23, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that state law should be revised to provide for refunds of employer contributions for municipal water and sewer departments in cities of the first class if the department becomes leased from the municipality and withdrawn from the Public Employees Retirement System and that the immediate refund of the contribution will assist certain municipalities in meeting their financial obligation for providing services to the public. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 998, § 3: Apr. 14, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that because of the case Ricarte v. State, CR 86-31, a question has arisen over the validity of Act 1187 of the Extended Session of 1976; that this Act is a reenactment of the former law; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to clarify the state of the law on this issue. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 50, § 4: Feb. 13, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that existing law relating to membership by county owned and operated hospitals in the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System is not clear due to the passage of various Acts pertaining thereto and the effect of Act 13 of the first Extraordinary Session of 1977; that hospitals owned and operated by counties are unsure as to their status with regard to the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System and the present law places a serious financial burden on the hospitals and employees of the hospital within this State; and that this Act is designed to permit the governing bodies of such hospitals to elect to exclude their employees from such membership and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 160, § 6: Feb. 21, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law is not clear in its meaning and could result in inequities; and that this should be remedied immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 299, § 28: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of law governing the Public Employees' Retirement System need clarification, standardization, and repeal and that the effective administration of State government makes it necessary for these changes to begin at the start of the State's fiscal year. Therefore, in order to promote sound fiscal administration of State government, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective July 1, 1997.”

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 69: Feb. 8, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes technical corrections to a number of sections of Arkansas Code Title 24; that other legislation of this session of the General Assembly may also amend some of those sections; that this act should become effective immediately so that other legislation may be amended to reflect the technical corrections made by this act and to avoid conflicts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 737, § 2: Mar. 25, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is confusion as to whether Arkansas Code § 24-4-302 applies to nursing homes, assisted living facilities, and other health care facilities owned but not operated by counties; that this confusion has resulted in litigation against the counties; and that this act is immediately necessary because county-owned nursing homes, assisted living facilities, and other health care facilities that are not operated by the county provide essential services to citizens of the state that are substantially similar to the services of hospitals, and without this clarification these facilities may cease to exist, which will cause irreparable harm to the people who depend on these facilities for day-to-day care. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 448, § 13: Mar. 13, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the system are in imminent need of revision; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the system. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

24-4-301. Membership as condition to employment.

Except as set forth in this subsection, all state employees, as defined in § 24-4-101(17) and (45), shall become members of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System as a condition of employment.

A person who is first elected as a member of the General Assembly on or after July 1, 1999, shall have his or her employment covered as a regular state employee member in lieu of coverage under special provisions relating to General Assembly members or to elected officials.

However, if the member's only service under an Arkansas retirement plan, as provided under § 24-2-401 et seq., is service as a member of the General Assembly, then the member must have ten (10) or more years of actual service to be eligible for benefits.

A person who was first elected as a member of the General Assembly before July 1, 1999, may elect to have his or her employment covered as a regular state employee member in lieu of coverage under special provisions relating to General Assembly members or to elected officials. The member may make the election at any time.

However, if the member's only service under an Arkansas retirement plan is service as a member of the General Assembly, then the member must have ten (10) or more years of actual service to be eligible for benefits.

Any member of the General Assembly who was serving in that capacity at the commencement of the Eighty-fourth General Assembly and who had elected not to participate in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System under the provisions of § 24-4-301(a)(2)(A) prior to its amendment by Acts 2003, No. 1403, may elect to participate and receive current credit in the system. The member is eligible to receive prior service credit for the time he or she was first elected to the General Assembly until the date of election to participate provided that:

The member pays, or causes to be paid, all employer contributions based on the employer's normal cost from the most recent actuarial valuation and the compensation that would have been paid had he or she been a member of the system during that time and regular interest on the employer contributions computed from the date the service was rendered to the date payment is received by the system;

The payment shall be made in a lump sum; and

The member may pay for all prior service, or a portion of the prior service, consisting of one-year increments.

All county employees, as defined in § 24-4-101(14), (17), and (27), who are in the employ of a county July 1, 1959, and all persons who became or become county employees in the employ of a county after June 30, 1959, shall become members of the system as a condition of continuing in or obtaining county employment, as the case may be.

All municipal employees, as defined in § 24-4-101(17), (24), and (27), who are in the employ of a municipality as of the date the municipality becomes a participating public employer and all persons who become municipal employees in the employ of a municipality on or after the date it becomes a participating public employer shall become members of the system as a condition of continuing in or entering the employ of the municipality. However, no employee shall be included whose compensation is less than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per annum.

All nonstate employees, as defined in § 24-4-101(17), (22), (27), and (33), who are in the employ of a nonstate employer as of the date the nonstate employer becomes a participating public employer and all persons who become nonstate employees in the employ of a nonstate employer on or after the date it becomes a participating public employer shall become members of the system as a condition of continuing in or entering the employ of the nonstate employer.

From and after July 1, 1973, all elected and appointed state and county constitutional officials shall be or become members of the system.

Any current member of the system who has service prior to July 1, 1973, as an elected or appointed constitutional official, which service is not credited to his or her retirement account because the member elected not to become a member of the system during that time, shall receive credited service for that time, but only if:

The person is a contributing member of the system on the date the service is purchased and the person has at the time of purchase at least two (2) years of credited service in the system;

The member buys all of the service rendered during the period of time in which he or she did not participate in the system; and

The member pays or causes to be paid all employee contributions at the rate and on the compensation that would have been paid had he or she been a member of the system during that period of time, all employer contributions based on the employer normal cost from the most recently completed regular annual actuarial valuation and the compensation that would have been paid had he or she been a member during that time, and regular interest on the employee and employer contributions computed from the date the service was rendered to the date the payment is received by the system.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 6; 1959, No. 42, § 6; 1961, No. 64, § 3; 1973, No. 586, § 1; 1975, No. 577, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2506; Acts 1987, No. 57, § 1; 1997, No. 299, § 12; 1999, No. 705, § 1; 2001, No. 151, § 16; 2003, No. 1403, § 1; 2007, No. 176, § 4; 2019, No. 448, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The reference in (a)(2)(B) to “the provisions of § 24-4-301(a)(2)(A) prior to its amendment by Acts 2003, No. 1403” is a reference to the version of subdivision (a)(2)(A) repealed by Acts 2003, No. 1403. Acts 2003, No. 1403 also redesignated former subdivision (a)(2)(C) as present subdivision (a)(2)(A). Former subdivision (a)(2)(A) read as follows:

“Membership in the system shall not be mandatory for any member of the General Assembly who notifies the system in writing of his or her decision not to participate. The member may elect not to participate for all or any part of his or her service or benefits as a member of the General Assembly. The member may make the election at any time.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment inserted “as provided under § 24-2-401 et seq.” in (a)(2)(A)(i)

(b)